Hawaii statutes.
[PART II. ACQUISITION
OF IMPORTANT AGRICULTURAL LANDS]

Note

Part designation added by revisor.

Cross References

Acquisition of resource value lands, see chapter 173A.

Legacy land conservation commission, see §§173A-2.4 to 2.6.

[§163D-31] Acquisitions of important
agricultural lands authorized by the legislature. (a) The legislature may
authorize the corporation to acquire agricultural lands for the protection of
agricultural lands, public land banking, or the promotion of farm ownership and
diversified agriculture.

(b) The acquisition shall be authorized by a
bill enacted into law and shall contain:

(1) A statement of the value of the interest in land
as a resource to the State;

(2) A description of the specific parcel of land or
agricultural easement proposed to be acquired;

(3) The name of the owner of the property; and

(4) The estimated costs of acquiring the interest in
the land.

(c) The landowner shall receive payment for
the interest in the land in a lump sum, through an installment purchase
agreement as determined pursuant to section 163D-32, or from revenues derived
from the issuance of revenue bonds pursuant to section 163D-9. [L 2008, c 234,
pt of §6]

Note

Acquisition of certain agricultural lands owned by the
Galbraith Estate; department of land and natural resources powers, etc. L 2008,
c 234, §§8 to 10.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next